Nevada, session 83, AB322.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 116 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, an
association shall not and the governing documents must not
prohibit a unit’s owner or a tenant of a unit’s owner from
operating a small child care establishment within a unit.
2. An association may adopt rules and regulations which are
consistent with any applicable laws or ordinances relating to the
operation of a small child care establishment and which establish
reasonable restrictions regarding the operation of a small child
care establishment within a unit including, without limitation, a
requirement that a small child care establishment must be
registered in accordance with the applicable provisions of chapter
432A of NRS.
3. As used in this section, “small child care establishment”
has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 432A.0295.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*AB322*